New Mexico, session 2026, SB244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five million dollars ($5,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of the university of New Mexico for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to support student athletes, including travel, nutrition and overall student athlete needs. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233650.2